lucene/analysis/common/src/test/org/apache/lucene/analysis/hunspell/dependencies.aff
SET UTF-8

PFX P Y 1
PFX P   0 un . [prefix_un]+

SFX S Y 1
SFX S   0 s . +PL

SFX Q Y 1
SFX Q   0 s . +3SGV

SFX R Y 1
SFX R   0 able/PS . +DER_V_ADJ_ABLE

PFX h Y 1
PFX h 0 de .

SFX A Y 1
SFX A te tion/S .

SFX s Y 1
SFX s 0 s .

PFX p Y 1
PFX p 0 0/s .
